Hawaii statutes.
[§454F-4.8] Decision denying
application subject to administrative hearing. (a) Within
fifteen days following receipt of a decision denying an application, an
applicant may petition the commissioner for an administrative hearing that
shall be held in accordance with chapter 91 and the rules of the department of
commerce and consumer affairs. If a petition for an administrative
hearing is not filed within the time specified, the commissioner's decision
denying the application shall become a final decision and order denying the
application.

(b) Upon the receipt of a petition for an
administrative hearing, the commissioner shall assign the petition to a
hearings officer for further proceedings pursuant to the rules of the
department of commerce and consumer affairs. The commissioner shall issue
a written final decision and order, following the hearings officer's
transmittal to the commissioner of the entire record together with the
recommended decision, any timely filed exceptions, and any timely filed statements
in support of the recommended decision. [L 2011, c 194, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next